Utah statutes.
78B-15-105.   Protection of participants.
Proceedings under this chapter are subject to other laws of this state
governing the health, safety, privacy, and liberty of a child or other
individual who could be jeopardized by disclosure of identifying information,
including address, telephone number, place of employment, Social Security
number, the child's day-care facility, or school.
